prince/dictionaries/ro.aff
SET ISO8859-2
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkw

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0          re         .

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0          nr         .

SFX L Y 5
SFX L   0          ul         [^auei]
SFX L   0          l          u
SFX L   0          le         [^cg] i
SFX L   0          i          [cg] i
SFX L   0          le         e

SFX U Y 2
SFX U   0          a          re
SFX U   0          i          [^i] ii

SFX P Y 2
SFX P   a          i          a
SFX P   l          i          l	

SFX W Y 1
SFX W   0          e          .

SFX M Y 1
SFX M   0          uri        .

SFX Z Y 3
SFX Z   0          i          [^ea]
SFX Z   e          i          e
SFX Z   a          e          a

SFX I Y 4
SFX I   0          lui        u
SFX I   0          ului       [^ua]
SFX I   a          ii         [gc] a
SFX I   a          ei         [^cg] a

SFX G Y 2
SFX G   0          lor        i
SFX G   0          ilor       [^i]

SFX R Y 1
SFX R   0          re         [iae]

SFX T Y 1
SFX T   0          t          a

SFX A Y 1
SFX A   0          a          .
