prince/dictionaries/ro.dic
achitare/AU
acid/W
acoperis/ILM
actiona/T
actiunii/E
actori/GZ
acumulare/AUZ
acuza/RTZ
acuzat/AGILZ
adaptabilitate/N
adinc/ALMZ
adinc/LMZ
adjuncti/Z
admirator/GZ
admitere/AUZ
adresez/WZ
adulare/AU
aduna/PRTZ
aduse/E
afecta/TZ
afisa/RTZ
ajunge/AZ
albanez/AGLZ
alcatuit/W
alee/AZ
alerga/TZ
Alsacia/I
alta/INPZ
alte/L
ambasadoare/AU
ambasador/GILZ
ambitia/PZ
ameliorare/AU
amesteca/RTZ
amic/GILNWZ
amintim/E
amplificat/AW
analist/GILZ
ancora/T
anihilare/AU
animal/ILW
anomalii/GL
antiguvernamentala/PZ
antrenat/A
apa/IRZ
aparat/AILMW
aparut/ALWZ
aplauda/T
apoi/N
apropia/PTZ
aproximare/AU
apus/AILW
arab/AGILWZ
aresta/RT
arestat/ALWZ
arhitect/ILM
arma/ITZ
aroma/Z
ars/AWZ
asasinat/ILW
asertiuni/GL
aseza/PRTZ
asezarea/E
asimilare/AU
asteptare/AUZ
astepta/RTZ
asternuturi/L
asuma/PRTZ
atent/AWZ
autorizatii/G
avangarda/I
ave/AR
aviatia/IZ
ax/AILW
axiologic/W
bagare/AU
baga/RT
balta/P
banc/ALM
ban/GILZ
basme/L
batrini/GZ
binele/A
biografic/AW
birt/I
biserica/IP
blind/LW
bogat/AGIWZ
bord/LM
bucla/IZ
bunuri/GL
burghezia/IP
cabluri/L
calc/ALWZ
calca/T
calculeaza/E
calitate/A
calomnie/RZ
calugarita/IZ
cancelarie/Z
candidat/AGILMWZ
capabil/NWZ
capat/AL
capsata/P
cara/IPRTZ
carare/AUZ
catarg/LW
cat/N
cauta/PRTZ
caviar/L
cazu/IL
cazut/AWZ
cel/EW
cercetari/GLZ
cere/ARUZ
ceremonia/IPZ
cer/ILMWZ
cersetoria/Z
certitudine/ANZ
chipuri/L
chiria/IZ
ciers/E
cimp/ILMZ
cinism/ILW
cintare/AUZ
cit/ALWZ
citind/EN
ciuda/T
civil/AGLWZ
cladi/ER
clasic/AGLWZ
cler/I
clinic/AWZ
codifica/RT
coerent/W
colectia/PZ
comandament/IL
comandat/AEW
comando/M
combinare/AUZ
comenta/T
comenzi/GLZ
comestibil/A
comisii/GL
comoda/N
compatibila/N
compatibilitate/ANZ
complet/AILWZ
componenta/IZ
compromite/R
compus/AIWZ
comuna/IPZ
comutare/AUZ
concatenat/A
concerta/TZ
concret/AILWZ
condus/LW
configurabila/E
confortul/N
congestia/IZ
consacra/PTZ
conservare/AU
conserva/RTZ
considerare/AU
consilier/GILZ
consimta/PZ
constatat/AW
constituire/AEU
constrins/Z
conta/TZ
contexte/L
continuat/A
continuu/N
contrabanda/I
contra/R
controlat/W
contur/AGLMZ
convingere/AUZ
copilaria/IPZ
copilas/G
corupt/AGLWZ
cosmos/IL
cotidian/ILW
crapa/RT
creat/AMWZ
creaza/E
credibila/N
credibil/ANW
creste/ARZ
crestin/AGIWZ
ctitorii/G
cuc/GILZ
cugetare/AUZ
culca/PRZ
culegeri/LZ
culte/NZ
cunoastem/E
cunostea/E
cupla/RT
curatit/A
curente/LZ
cursiv/E
cusur/M
cusut/AW
cuta/R
daruri/L
debarcare/AU
debut/ILM
decizionala/P
declansa/T
decor/AL
definiti/AWZ
delicatete/N
demasca/RT
demisiona/T
democratizare/AU
demon/GLZ
denumeste/E
depanat/Z
depasire/AU
dependenta/INPZ
dependent/NW
deplasari/LZ
deposedare/AU
depozitar/AW
deputat/IL
descarca/RTZ
desemna/RT
desfasurare/AUZ
despartit/AWZ
detalia/PT
detasa/RT
determinat/AWZ
devenise/E
dezbina/RTZ
dezlegare/AU
diabolic/AW
dichis/LM
dictatorial/AZ
digital/W
dihonia/I
directa/N
directori/GZ
disciplina/IRTZ
discretie/N
discuta/PRTZ
disociere/AUZ
dispozitia/PZ
dispunea/N
dispune/AR
diversionist/W
diversiuni/L
divort/ILM
dizidenta/IZ
doi/N
drept/GILMWZ
dresat/E
drob/I
dublare/AU
dublat/AWZ
duca/EN
ducea/EN
ducind/E
duh/IL
dulap/ILM
dusen/E
dusman/AGILZ
duzina/P
echipat/WZ
editor/ILZ
efectua/T
eficace/N
eficient/NW
elev/GILWZ
elibera/RT
eliptic/A
embargou/IL
emit/W
enumerare/AU
epava/IZ
epidemia/PZ
eroda/RT
eseist/AGILZ
estimare/AUZ
etichete/L
etnia/IPZ
evalua/RT
evaluat/AW
evalueaza/E
evitare/AU
exagerat/AWZ
excela/T
executa/PRTZ
execut/AW
existent/NW
exotism/LW
explica/PTZ
explorare/AU
export/ILMW
expresii/GL
extrem/AIW
facind/E
facultati/GZ
faimos/ILZ
falimenta/RTZ
falsificare/Z
faptuit/N
faptura/P
favoriza/RT
felii/L
fervoare/AU
fes/M
festiv/W
filtreaza/N
firma/E
fixa/TZ
flexibil/ANW
fluent/AN
fluture/LZ
foamea/P
foca/R
foloseasca/E
fond/ILM
for/ALM
forma/N
formatii/EN
formatii/GN
formator/EN
formind/N
formulare/ALUZ
fragmenta/RTZ
frontispiciu/L
funda/N
funerar/W
galagia/Z
gara/P
gaseasca/E
gazetari/GZ
geam/LM
generarea/E
genial/ALZ
Germania/IZ
gestiona/RT
gidila/T
globalizare/AU
gol/LMZ
grafomani/A
gratia/PZ
gri/L
grimasa/Z
groapa/N
guvernanti/GZ
han/GIM
hotii/L
iaer/E
ideal/AILMW
ideal/IW
identifica/PRTZ
ilustra/RTZ
imaginatia/IZ
imbarcare/AU
imbata/T
imi/N
imparatia/IP
imping/AWZ
important/LW
improprietarire/AU
improspata/R
imprumut/ALMWZ
imputa/TZ
inaintat/AWZ
incasare/AUZ
incasari/GL
incep/WZ
incerca/PRTZ
inclinatia/IPZ
incolonat/AZ
incredere/AU
incurca/TZ
indelungate/L
indexare/AU
index/M
indica/IPTZ
indigna/RT
industrial/AWZ
inexactitate/Z
infirma/PRZ
influenta/IPTZ
infringere/AUZ
infrint/AGW
infrunta/RTZ
inger/GLZ
initializeaza/ER
innoda/T
innoire/AUZ
inscena/RT
inspaimintator/Z
instantiere/AUZ
instiinta/T
institutia/IPZ
instructaj/LW
interactiune/AZ
interlocutor/GILZ
interna/PRTZ
interpretare/AUZ
intersectia/IPZ
interventii/GL
intitula/T
intoarca/Z
intrarea/E
intreba/PRTZ
intrece/R
intregire/AU
intunec/W
inventind/E
inversunare/AU
investiga/R
investit/M
invinge/A
invita/RTZ
israelieni/GZ
Italia/IZ
judeca/PRTZ
justetea/N
justificare/AU
justificate/L
lac/ILM
lansa/ERT
lant/LM
largi/R
lat/LMW
leaga/E
lectia/PZ
legal/AWZ
lejer/AW
liberal/AGLWZ
linia/AIPZ
litera/IRTZ
livrare/AU
local/AILMWZ
locuieste/NZ
locuit/NWZ
luam/E
lucra/RT
lucruri/GL
ludic/I
luminare/AUZ
luna/PR
luptator/LZ
maniere/E
manuscris/ILW
marca/EPT
mars/ILM
marturisiri/GL
masinaria/PZ
masurabil/A
masuratoare/AU
masuratori/GLZ
medierea/E
melc/IZ
mentine/R
meschinaria/P
mesteca/T
mestecat/EZ
metode/L
minati/N
minciuni/GLZ
ministerial/AWZ
mintea/E
mintuire/AU
minuscul/LW
modela/RTZ
modernism/I
modernizare/AU
moderniza/RT
mod/ILMW
mondena/PZ
mosier/GZ
mostenitor/GLZ
multiplica/TZ
nas/ILM
nationala/IPZ
nebunii/GL
necontenit/AW
nega/PRTZ
negativ/AIWZ
neglijabil/AZ
negociator/GILZ
neincredere/AU
nerozia/PZ
nevralgic/W
nisipuri/L
nivel/ILMW
normali/E
nuanta/RTZ
numeroasa/Z
obraznic/AZ
observator/GLZ
ocupa/PTZ
oltean/I
onor/AM
operatia/IPZ
oportun/ANW
oprelisti/G
optimist/AGIWZ
opus/ALWZ
ordona/RT
orientare/AU
otrava/P
palpitant/A
para/E
pari/AIM
parlamentar/AGLWZ
parlamentari/GZ
partener/GILZ
pasa/E
pastor/L
paza/IP
pecuniar/AW
penetra/RT
persecutia/Z
picaturi/GL
pic/AWZ
pinza/IZ
pirateria/PZ
plan/ILM
plecam/E
plic/LMZ
politicieni/GZ
politologia/IP
pondere/AUZ
porc/GILZ
porni/R
posedat/WZ
post/ILM
pozitiv/ILWZ
precisa/IPZ
preferinta/Z
pregatit/AWZ
premia/PT
premier/ILW
prescurta/RT
pretins/AGWZ
prezentare/AEU
prezicere/AU
prezinta/E
primaria/IPZ
principat/ILW
problema/IZ
producea/E
produs/ILW
programa/RTZ
proiectant/GLZ
promis/AWZ
propagandist/AGL
propozitia/IPZ
provoca/RT
publicarea/E
publicistica/IZ
punct/AILW
pur/ALMWZ
purtare/AUZ
puscarias/GZ
pusta/P
rafinament/ILW
raport/AILM
rari/R
rasturnare/AU
rata/E
reafirma/RT
reale/RZ
rece/ALZ
recrutare/AU
redacta/RT
reformist/W
regiuni/GLZ
reincarca/R
relief/ILM
renormal/Z
reper/ALW
reprimare/AU
republica/I
respecta/PRTZ
resurectia/P
returna/T
revers/L
revizionist/GW
rezonabil/AWZ
riscuri/GL
ritual/LM
rula/RT
rulat/AWZ
salt/ILM
samanatorism/IL
sanie/Z
saraci/GLZ
sarbatoare/AU
sarcina/P
sarut/AILMW
sat/ILMW
scapa/PRTZ
scap/AWZ
schimba/PRTZ
scrierea/EN
scrisa/EZ
scriu/N
scut/LMZ
sectiune/AZ
securisti/GZ
semnat/AMWZ
semnificatia/IPZ
semnind/N
sera/PZ
sergent/IL
se/RZ
sfirsit/ILM
simt/AILMWZ
simulare/AUZ
sincer/AWZ
sintetiza/RT
sira/N
sirbi/GZ
sistarea/E
snob/GI
sonate/L
sordid/AIL
sosira/Z
specialist/AGLZ
spor/LMZ
sportiv/ALWZ
stanta/N
statistica/IPZ
stenograma/IZ
sti/ARWZ
stingere/AU
straduinta/Z
strig/AWZ
student/IL
studio/ILM
subaltern/GZ
sublinia/T
subred/AW
sul/EN
sumare/E
supusi/GZ
sut/M
talentat/AILZ
tari/AGLWZ
taxa/PTZ
tectonic/A
telefon/AIL
tel/LM
tematic/W
tergiversare/AUZ
terna/NR
testa/RTZ
testat/EW
timp/GILMZ
tina/EN
tineret/GILWZ
tita/I
toleranta/INPZ
tolera/T
ton/AILMW
tragic/ALW
transcendental/W
transformat/AWZ
transmise/E
transmite/ARZ
trasa/PRTZ
trasat/AMWZ
trebuinta/N
trimite/ARZ
trucuri/GL
trupa/IZ
tun/AILM
uimire/AU
umble/Z
unificarea/E
unifica/RT
universitar/LWZ
urit/ILW
urmat/AW
usi/GLZ
utilitate/AN
uzina/IZ
valideaza/N
val/ILMW
vechitura/P
venira/E
vestitor/GNZ
veti/EN
vi/ALRWZ
vigilent/ALZ
violare/AU
viol/IM
vislas/Z
viziune/AZ
vizor/EL
vocatia/IPZ
voiosi/WZ
zbor/ILMZ
zei/GZ
